Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB257.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 205.178 is amended to read as follows:
(1) At a regularly scheduled interval, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency
associated with the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program of the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Kentucky
Lottery Corporation concerning individuals enrolled as recipients in the Medicaid
program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that may
indicate[indicates] a change in circumstances that would[may] affect eligibility,
including but not limited to changes in income or resources.
(2) On at least a monthly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated
with the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program of
the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Vital Statistics Branch
concerning individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program or the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program that may indicate[indicates] a change in
circumstances that would[may] affect eligibility.
(3) On at least a quarterly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated
with the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program of
the cabinet shall receive and review information from the Kentucky Office of
Unemployment Insurance concerning individuals enrolled in the Medicaid program
or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that may indicate[indicates] a
change in circumstances that would[may] affect eligibility, including but not
limited to changes in employment or wages.
(4) On at least a quarterly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated
with the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program of
the cabinet shall receive and review information concerning individuals enrolled in
the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that
Page 1 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
indicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility, including but not
limited to potential changes in residency as identified by out-of-state electronic
benefit transfer transactions.
(5) On at least a quarterly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency
associated with the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program of the cabinet
shall receive and review information concerning individuals enrolled in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that may indicate a change in
circumstances that would affect eligibility, including but not limited to potential
changes in employment or wages as identified by the state directory of new hires.
(6) On at least a monthly basis, each enrollment or benefit tracking agency
associated with the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program of the cabinet
shall receive and review information concerning individuals enrolled in the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program to assess continuing eligibility,
including information on:
(a) Earned income, death, incarceration, supplemental security income,
beneficiary records, and pension information maintained by the United
States Social Security Administration;
(b) Income and employment information maintained by the National Directory
of New Hires database and child support enforcement data maintained by
the United States Department of Health and Human Services;
(c) Payment and earnings information maintained by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development;
(d) National fleeing felon information maintained by the United States Federal
Bureau of Investigation; and
(e) Address change information maintained in the United States Postal Service
National Change of Address database.
(7)[(5)] Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary:
Page 2 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
(a) The cabinet and each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with
the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program[ of
the cabinet] shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with any
department, agency, or division for information detailed in this section; and
(b) Any department, agency, or division for information detailed in this section,
including but not limited to the Kentucky Lottery Corporation, the Vital
Statistics Branch, the Office of Unemployment Insurance, and the Department
for Community Based Services, shall enter into any necessary memoranda of
understanding with the enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with
the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
requesting an agreement pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(8)[(6)] The cabinet and each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with
the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program[ of the
cabinet] may contract in accordance with KRS Chapter 45A with one (1) or more
independent vendors to provide additional data or information that may indicate a
change in circumstances that may affect eligibility.
(9)[(7)] The cabinet and each enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with
the Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program[ of the
cabinet] shall explore joining any multistate cooperative to identify individuals who
are also enrolled in public assistance programs outside of this state.
(10)[(8)] If the cabinet or an enrollment or benefit tracking agency associated with the
Medicaid program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program[ of the
cabinet] receives information concerning an individual enrolled in the Medicaid
program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program that may
indicate[indicates] a change in circumstances that would[may] affect eligibility, the
cabinet or enrollment or benefit tracking agency or other appropriate agency shall
review the individual's case.
Page 3 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
(11)[(9)] (a) Unless expressly required by federal law or as permitted by this
subsection, the cabinet shall not seek, apply for, accept, or renew any waiver
of work requirements established by the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program under 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(o) without first obtaining specific
authorization from the General Assembly to do so. The cabinet may, without
first obtaining specific authorization from the General Assembly, request:
1. A waiver of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program work
requirements for a county in which the unemployment rate is equal to or
greater than ten percent (10%);
2. A waiver of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program work
requirements in a county in which the cabinet determines that other
economic conditions are severe enough to necessitate a waiver; or
3. A statewide waiver of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program work
requirements if the state's unemployment rate is equal to or greater than
ten percent (10%).
(b) The cabinet shall not exercise the state's option under 7 U.S.C. sec.
2015(o)(6)(F).
(c) The cabinet may assign individuals who are subject to work requirements
under 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(d)(1) to an employment and training program as
defined in 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(d)(4).
(12)[(10)] The cabinet shall, in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, promulgate[ all rules
and] administrative regulations necessary for the purposes of carrying out this
section.
(13)[(11)] Upon request from the Legislative Research Commission, the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services shall submit a report relating to the number of
individuals discovered utilizing services inappropriately, the number of individuals
who were removed from one (1) or more public assistance programs as a result of a
Page 4 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
review pursuant to this section, and the amount of public funds preserved in total
and by public assistance program and aggregated by prior years.
Section 2. KRS 205.200 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A needy aged person, a needy blind person, a needy child, a needy permanently and
totally disabled person, or a person with whom a needy child lives shall be eligible
to receive a public assistance grant only if he or she has made a proper application
or an application has been made on his or her behalf in the manner and form
prescribed by administrative regulation. No individual shall be eligible to receive
public assistance under more than one (1) category of public assistance for the same
period of time.
(2) The secretary shall, by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A, prescribe the conditions of eligibility for public assistance in
conformity with the public assistance titles of the Social Security Act, its
amendments, and other federal acts and regulations. The secretary shall also
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to
allow for between a forty percent (40%) and a forty-five percent (45%) ratable
reduction in the method of calculating eligibility and benefits for public assistance
under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act. In no instance shall grants to
families with no income be less than the appropriate grant maximum used for
public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act. As used in
this section, "ratable reduction" means the percentage reduction applied to the
deficit between the family's countable income and the standard of need for the
appropriate family size.
(3) The secretary may by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A require[ prescribe] as a condition of eligibility that a needy child
regularly attend school, and may further by administrative regulation
require[prescribe] the degree of relationship of the person or persons in whose
Page 5 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
home such needy child must reside.
(4) The secretary may by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A prescribe conditions for bringing paternity proceedings or
actions for support in cases of out of wedlock birth or nonsupport by a parent in the
public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act program.
(5) Public assistance shall not be payable to or in behalf of any individual who has
taken any legal action in his or her own behalf or in the behalf of others with the
intent and purpose of creating eligibility for the assistance.
(6) The cabinet shall promptly notify the appropriate law enforcement officials of the
furnishing of public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act
in respect to a child who has been deserted or abandoned by a parent.
(7) A[No] person shall not be eligible for public assistance payments if, after having
been determined to be potentially responsible, and afforded notice and opportunity
for hearing, he or she refuses without good cause:
(a) To register for employment with the state employment service,
(b) To accept suitable training, or
(c) To accept suitable employment.
The secretary may prescribe by administrative regulation in accordance with[,
subject to the provisions of] KRS Chapter 13A, standards of suitability for training
and employment.
(8) To the extent permitted by federal law, scholarships, grants, or other types of
financial assistance for education shall not be considered as income for the purpose
of determining eligibility for public assistance.
(9) To the extent permitted by federal law, any money received because of a settlement
or judgment in a lawsuit brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent
Orange" for damages resulting from exposure to "Agent Orange" by a member or
veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person
Page 6 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
who served in Vietnam shall not be considered as income for the purpose of
determining eligibility or continuing eligibility for public assistance and shall not be
subject to a lien or be available for repayment to the Commonwealth for public
assistance received by the recipient.
(10) (a) For the purpose of determining eligibility for medical assistance under Title
XIX of the Social Security Act, unless otherwise required by federal law, the
cabinet shall only accept self-attestation of income, residency, age, household
composition, caretaker or relative status, or receipt of other coverage as
verification of last resort prior to enrollment, and the cabinet shall not request
federal authorization or approval to waive or decline to periodically check any
available income-related data source to verify eligibility.
(b) This subsection shall not apply to any individual who is a resident of an
assisted living community as defined in KRS 194A.700 or to a long-term care
facility as defined in KRS 216A.010 or hospital licensed under KRS Chapter
216B that is using self-attestation to determine presumptive eligibility.
(c) If an individual for medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security
Act willingly and knowingly self-attests to falsified information related to
income, residency, age, household composition, caretaker or relative status, or
receipt of other coverage, the cabinet may fine the individual not more than
five hundred dollars ($500) per offense.
(11) When determining whether an applicant for services or assistance provided under
this chapter meets the applicable income eligibility guidelines, the cabinet shall use
the most recent income verification data available and consider fluctuating
employment income data.
(12) If in the normal course of operations, the cabinet finds that an individual has
trafficked, sold, distributed, given, or otherwise transferred an electronic benefit
transfer card issued by the department for money, service, or other valuable
Page 7 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
consideration, the cabinet, to the extent permitted under state and federal law:
(a) Shall through any means practical, including but not limited to garnishment of
future cash assistance benefits, seek recoupment from the individual of any
cash benefits trafficked, sold, distributed, given, or otherwise transferred; and
(b) May:
1. Upon the first violation, deem the individual ineligible for all public
assistance programs administered by the cabinet under this chapter for a
period of not more than six (6) months;
2. Upon the second violation, deem the individual ineligible for all public
assistance programs administered by the cabinet under this chapter for a
period of not more than twelve (12) months; and
3. Upon the third violation, deem the individual ineligible for all public
assistance programs administered by the cabinet under this chapter for a
period of not more than five (5) years.
(13) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of Kentucky law, the following shall be
disregarded for the purposes of determining an individual's eligibility for a
means-tested public assistance program, and the amount of assistance or
benefits the individual is eligible to receive under the program:
1. Any amount in an ABLE account;
2. Any contributions to an ABLE account; and
3. Any distribution from an ABLE account for qualified disability
expenses.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
1. "ABLE account" means an account established within any state having a
qualified ABLE program as provided in 26 U.S.C. sec. 529A, as
amended;
2. "Kentucky law" includes:
Page 8 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
a. All provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes:
b. Any contract to provide Medicaid managed care established
pursuant to this chapter;
c. Any agreement to operate a Medicaid program established
pursuant to this chapter; and
d. Any administrative regulation promulgated pursuant to this
chapter; and
3. "Qualified disability expenses" means expenses described in 26 U.S.C.
sec. 529A of a person who is the beneficiary of an ABLE account.
(14) (a) Residency shall not be established for an individual if the individual relocates
to Kentucky with the sole intention of establishing eligibility to receive
medical services, including substance use disorder treatment services under
this chapter.
(b) An individual may rebut the sole intention of paragraph (a) of this subsection
by showing proof of residency. Proof of residency shall include but not be
limited to the possession of a valid Kentucky operator's license or a copy of a
deed or property tax bill, utility agreement or bill, or rental housing
agreement.
(15) (a) When determining eligibility for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, the cabinet shall not:
1. Grant categorical eligibility under 7 U.S.C. sec. 2014(a) or 7 C.F.R.
sec. 273.2(j)(2)(ii) for any noncash or in-kind services, or other benefit
unless expressly required by federal law;
2. Apply gross income standards higher than the standards specified in 7
U.S.C. sec. 2014(c) or allowable financial resources higher than the
standards specified in 7 U.S.C. sec. 2014(g)(1), except as provided in
paragraph (b) of this subsection, unless expressly required by federal
Page 9 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
law; or
3. Grant categorical eligibility, exempting households from such gross
income standards or allowable financial resource standards for any
noncash or in-kind services, or other benefits, unless expressly
required by federal law.
(b) The cabinet may apply alternate vehicle allowance standards, in accordance
with 7 U.S.C. sec. 2014(g)(2)(D) when counting allowable financial
resources and household income for purposes of determining Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program eligibility.
(c) 1. Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, the cabinet shall assign
certification periods of no greater than four (4) months for households
enrolled in the Supplemental Nutrition Program:
a. With zero net income; or
b. That includes an able-bodied adult without dependents.
2. The limitations established in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall
not apply to any household that includes an elderly or disabled
member.
3. The cabinet may shorten the certification period upon a
determination, based on documented and specific changes in a
household's circumstances, that the household is likely to become
ineligible before the end of the assigned certification period.
(d) The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A to implement this subsection.
(16) (a) Pursuant to 7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(f), an individual shall not be eligible to
receive Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits unless the
individual is a resident of the United States and is:
1. A citizen or national of the United States;
Page 10 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
2. An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence as an immigrant,
as defined in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1101(a)(15) and (20) and U. S.C.
sec.1641(b)(1), excluding alien visitors, tourists, diplomats, students,
or other individuals admitted temporarily without intent to abandon
their residence in a foreign country;
3. An alien who has been granted the status of a Cuban or Haitian
entrant, as defined in Section 501(e) of the Refugee Education
Assistance Act of 1980 Pub. L. No. 96-422, and 8 U. S. C. sec.
1641(b)(7); or
4. An individual lawfully residing in the United States in accordance
with a Compact of Free Association, as referenced in 8 U.S.C. sec.
1612(b)(2)(G).
(b) The cabinet shall be required to verify that an individual is eligible to
participate in the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program pursuant to 7
U.S.C. sec. 2015(f) and paragraph (a) of this subsection during enrollment
and eligibility recertification by requiring the individual to provide an
acceptable form of proof of citizenship or eligible alien status including but
not limited to:
1. Birth or hospital record;
2. Voter registration card;
3. United States passport; or
4. United States Customs and Immigration Service documentation.
(c) The cabinet shall verify that an applicant or enrollee of the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program is eligible pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements
Program operated by the United States Department of Homeland Security
and any other verification system at the time of application, at each
Page 11 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
eligibility recertification, and whenever information is received indicating a
change in circumstances affecting eligibility related to citizenship or
immigration status.
(d) A match through any electronic or data verification system shall not, by
itself, be accepted as proof of identity. Every applicant for the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program shall be required to provide documentary
proof pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(e) 1. If the cabinet confirms through verification that an applicant or
enrollee for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program is not
lawfully present in the United States or no longer qualifies pursuant to
7 U.S.C. sec. 2015(f), 8 U.S.C. sec. 1641(b), and paragraph (a) of this
subsection, or any successor provision of state or federal law, the
cabinet shall immediately terminate future Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program benefits and initiate disenrollment.
2. An applicant who is subject to termination and disenrollment pursuant
to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph but whose lawful presence or
eligible alien status is pending verification may receive temporary
benefits only for the minimum period required under federal law, or, if
no minimum period is specified, for a period not to exceed ninety (90)
days from the date of the original verification request.
(f) The cabinet shall submit to the United States Department of Agriculture
information concerning any household member for whom it is unable to
verify under paragraph (a) of this subsection, regardless of whether such
household member is applying to participate in the program as a member of
the household.
(g) Notwithstanding any options provided under 7 C.F.R. sec. 273.11(c)(3),
when administering Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits,
Page 12 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2143
including eligibility and household benefit allotment, the cabinet shall not
prorate or exclude the income or financial resources of individuals
ineligible under paragraph (a) of this subsection who are members of the
household. All such income and resources shall be fully considered.
Page 13 of 13
XXXX 2/26/2026 12:44 PM Jacketed